Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 238A.134 is amended to read:
238A.134. For purposes of determining the salary, as defined in ORS 238A.005 (17), of  an active
member of the Public Employees Retirement System, a  housing allowance paid to a member in re-
turn for services as a prison chaplain or a chaplain at the Oregon Health and Science University
shall be treated as if it were includable in the member’s taxable income under Oregon law.
SECTION 2.  ORS 238A.134, as amended by section 8, chapter 101, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
238A.134. For purposes  of determining the salary, as defined in ORS 238A.005 (18), of an active
member of the Public Employees Retirement System, a housing  allowance paid to a member in re-
turn for services as a prison chaplain or a chaplain at the Oregon Health and Science University
shall be treated as if it were includable in the member’s taxable income under Oregon law.
SECTION 3. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the amendments  to
ORS 238A.134 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act apply to housing allowances paid before,
on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 238A.134 by sections 1  and 2 of this 2025 Act apply only to
members whose effective date of retirement is on or after the effective date of this  2025 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 757 (SB 757-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 757 (SB 757-A) Page 2